Alaska, session 34, SB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 14.33.220(b) is amended to read: 07 (b) A school employee, student, or volunteer who has witnessed, or has 08 reliable information that a student has been subjected to, harassment, intimidation, or 09 bullying, whether verbal or physical, shall report the incident to an appropriate school 10 official and a child advocacy center. In this subsection, "child advocacy center" 11 has the meaning given in AS 47.17.033(l). 12 * Sec. 2. AS 14.33 is amended by adding a new section to read: 13 Sec. 14.33.240. Parental notification. A school district may adopt a plan to 14 notify the parents or guardians of a student of an incident of harassment, intimidation, 01 or bullying involving the student or threat of suicide by the student. A school district 02 that notifies a parent or guardian under this section shall provide to the parent or 03 guardian suicide prevention resources and information about how to 04 (1) limit a student's access to firearms and lethal medications; 05 (2) securely store firearms, ammunition, and lethal medications, 06 including in a safe storage device; and 07 (3) request a free safe storage device from the firearm safe storage 08 grant fund established under AS 44.41.080. 09 * Sec. 3. AS 44.29.350 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 10 (b) The council may advise a school district of appropriate materials and 11 reference lists that the district may provide to a parent or guardian under the 12 circumstances described under AS 14.33.240. 13 * Sec. 4. AS 44.41 is amended by adding a new section to read: 14 Sec. 44.41.080. Firearm safe storage grant fund. (a) The firearm safe storage 15 grant fund is established in the general fund. The department shall manage the fund 16 and may use money in the fund without further appropriation to purchase firearm safe 17 storage devices and distribute the devices at no cost to school districts. Money in the 18 fund does not lapse. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund, including 19 grant money the department receives for the purpose of providing to school districts 20 firearm safe storage devices and funds to purchase firearm safe storage devices, and 21 donations to the fund. 22 (b) Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund. 23 (c) The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative 24 Procedure Act) to implement this section. 25 (d) In this section, 26 (1) "department" means the Department of Public Safety; 27 (2) "firearm safe storage device" means a lock box, safe, cable lock, or 28 other device that is used to prevent unauthorized access to a firearm or to store a 29 firearm. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.